New York, session 2025-2026, A6661.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to 4 Sergeant James S. Hayes. All that portion of the state highway system 5 constituting state route 14 beginning at its intersection with Plum 6 Point Road in the town of Milo, county of Yates, continuing in a gener- 7 ally northerly direction, and terminating at its intersection with state 8 route 54, also known as Main Street, in the village of Dresden, county 9 of Yates, shall be dedicated to Sergeant James S. Hayes. 10 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 11 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 12 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 13 signing shall state "Highway Dedicated to Sergeant James S Hayes". 14 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 15 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 16 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway 17 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04894-04-5